Illinois, session 104th, SB3573.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Underground Utility Facilities 5Damage Prevention Act is amended by adding Section 4.2 as 6follows: 7    (220 ILCS 50/4.2 new)8    Sec. 4.2. Fiber optic excavation crews.9    (a) As used in this Section, "fiber optic excavation crew" 10means a group of individuals who are assembled or employed to 11excavate underground fiber optic conduit, ducts, cable lines, 12wires, or related facilities.13    (b) A fiber optic excavation crew shall comply with the 14following requirements: 15        (1) Every member of the fiber optic excavation crew 16    must have completed a safety and installation training 17    course provided by JULIE.18        (2) Throughout an excavation project, the fiber optic 19    excavation crew shall only use updated city maps, county 20    maps, and right-of-way maps that are less than 2 years 21    old.22        (3) The fiber optic excavation crew shall obtain a 23    surety bond that is conditioned on the fiber optic   SB3573- 2 -LRB104 20060 AAS 33511 b1    excavation crew's compliance with this Section. Proof of 2    the surety bond shall be provided to the unit of local 3    government with jurisdiction over the excavation project. 4    The amount of the surety bond shall be a reasonable amount 5    set by the applicable unit of local government.6        (4) Within 30 days after the completion of an 7    excavation project, the fiber optic excavation crew shall 8    fully restore any residential and landowner ground surface 9    and landscaping to the condition the applicable land was 10    in before the excavation project commenced. The manager or 11    supervisor of the fiber optic excavation crew shall send, 12    and the project owner shall confirm the submission of, a 13    letter affirming the restoration of the affected land to 14    the mayor or the applicable township official of the land 15    on which the project is located. 16    (c) A person who violates this Section shall receive a 17warning letter from the Commission or the applicable unit of 18local government for the first violation, a fine of $1,000 for 19the second violation, and a fine of no more than $5,000 for 20each subsequent violation. The Commission may enter into an 21arbitration process with a person who violates this Section 5 22or more times to determine the proper damages, repayment, and 23fines for the violations.